test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-4w-ihkwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - ihkwa :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      ihkwa+N+A+Sg: ihkwa   #  a louse
      ihkwa+N+A+Pl: ihkwak   #  lice
      ihkwa+N+A+Obv: ihkwa   #  an/other louse(s)

      # Poss
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitihkom   #  my louse
      ihkwa+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otihkoma   #  his/her other louse(s)
      

      # Nonposs
      ihkwa+N+A+Sg: ihkwa   #  a louse
      ihkwa+N+A+Pl: ihkwak   #  lice
      ihkwa+N+A+Obv: ihkwa   #  an/other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Distr: ihkonâhk   #  among lice
      

      # Der/Dim
      ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [ihkos, ihkosîs]   #  a little louse
      

      # Poss # Sg
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitihkom   #  my louse
      ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitihkom   #  your louse
      
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitihkominân   #  our louse
      ihkwa+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kitihkominaw   #  your and our louse
      ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitihkomiwâw   #  your louse
      
      
      

      # Poss # Pl
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitihkomak   #  my lice
      ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitihkomak   #  your lice
      
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitihkominânak   #  our lice
      ihkwa+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kitihkominawak   #  your and our lice
      ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitihkomiwâwak   #  your lice
      
      
      

      # Poss # Obv
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitihkoma   #  my other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitihkoma   #  your other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otihkoma   #  his/her other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitihkominâna   #  our other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: kitihkominawa   #  your and our other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitihkomiwâwa   #  your other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otihkomiwâwa   #  their other louse(s)
      ihkwa+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otihkomithiwa   #  another's/others' other louse(s)
      
